Washington statutes.
RCW 22.32.050

Delivery of goods without taking up receipt.

Each person mentioned in RCW 22.32.020 who shall deliver to another any goods, wares or merchandise for which a bill of lading, receipt or voucher has been issued, unless such bill of lading, receipt or voucher is surrendered and canceled or a lawful and sufficient bond or undertaking is given therefor at the time of such delivery, or unless, in case of a partial delivery, a memorandum thereof is endorsed upon such bill of lading, receipt or voucher, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1909 c 249 s 395; RRS s 2647.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: Caption for 1909 c 249 s 395 reads as follows: "SEC. 395. BILL OF LADING OR RECEIPT MUST BE CANCELED ON REDELIVERY OF PROPERTY."